Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.170

Costs to judgment debtor, when.

Where the judgment debtor or other person against whom the special proceeding is instituted has been examined, and property applicable to the payment of the judgment has not been discovered, the judge may make an order allowing him or her a sum, not to exceed twenty-five dollars, as costs, provided that any such sum so allowed the judgment debtor, shall be set off against the amount due the judgment creditor on his or her judgment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 159; 1923 c 160 s 2; 1893 c 133 s 17; RRS s 629.]